Illinois, session 104th, SB2030.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 8    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 9record that contains information that is exempt from 10disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 11that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 12to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 13shall make the remaining information available for inspection 14and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 15be exempt from inspection and copying: 16        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and   SB2030- 2 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    specifically designed to provide information to one or 2    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 3    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 4        (c) Personal information contained within public 5    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 6    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 7    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 8    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 9    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 10    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 11    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 12    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 13    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 14    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 15    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 16    privacy. 17        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 18    created in the course of administrative enforcement 19    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 20    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 21    extent that disclosure would: 22            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 23        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 24        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 25        agency that is the recipient of the request; 26            (ii) interfere with active administrative   SB2030- 3 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 2        that is the recipient of the request; 3            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 4        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 5        hearing; 6            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 7        confidential source, confidential information 8        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 9        who file complaints with or provide information to 10        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 11        penal agencies; except that the identities of 12        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 13        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 14        local government, except when disclosure would 15        interfere with an active criminal investigation 16        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 17        request; 18            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 19        techniques other than those generally used and known 20        or disclose internal documents of correctional 21        agencies related to detection, observation, or 22        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 23        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 24        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 25        request; 26            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law   SB2030- 4 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 2            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 3        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 4        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 5    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 6    record management system if the law enforcement agency 7    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 8    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 9    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 10    access to the record through the shared electronic record 11    management system. 12        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 13    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 14    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 15    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 16    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 17    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 18    Board. 19        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 20    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 21    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 22        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 23    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 24        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those   SB2030- 5 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    materials are available in the library of the correctional 2    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 3    confined. 4        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 7    materials include records from staff members' personnel 8    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 9    information. 10        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 13    through an administrative request to the Department of 14    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 15    Mental Health. 16        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 19    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 20    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 21    institution or facility.22        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 23    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 24    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 25    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 26    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited   SB2030- 6 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 2    or school address, work telephone number, social security 3    number, or any other identifying information, except as 4    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 5    or claim. 6        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person committed to the Department of 8    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 9    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 10    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 11    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 12    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 13    claim. 14        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 15    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 16    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 17    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 18    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 19    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 20    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 21    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 22    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 23        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 24    information obtained from a person or business where the 25    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 26    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary,   SB2030- 7 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 2    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 3    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 4    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 5    requested.6        The information included under this exemption includes 7    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 8    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 9    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 10    company within the investment portfolio of a private 11    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 12    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 13    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 14    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 15    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 16    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 17    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 18    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 20    privately held company may cause competitive harm.21        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 22    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 23    to disclosure. 24        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 25    agreement, including information which if it were 26    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage   SB2030- 8 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 2    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 3    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 4    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 5    award or final selection is made. 6        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 7    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 8    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 9    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 10    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 11    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 12    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 13    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 14    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 15    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 16    legal rights of the general public. 17        (j) The following information pertaining to 18    educational matters:19            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 20        examination data used to administer an academic 21        examination; 22            (ii) information received by a primary or 23        secondary school, college, or university under its 24        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 25        their academic peers; 26            (iii) information concerning a school or   SB2030- 9 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 2        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 3        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and4            (iv) course materials or research materials used 5        by faculty members. 6        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 7    submissions, and other construction related technical 8    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 9    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 10    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 11    including, but not limited to, power generating and 12    distribution stations and other transmission and 13    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 14    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 15    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 16    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 17    security. 18        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 19    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 20    public body makes the minutes available to the public 21    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 22        (m) Communications between a public body and an 23    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 24    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 25    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 26    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative   SB2030- 10 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 2    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 3    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 4        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 5    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 6    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 7    cases in which discipline is imposed. 8        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 9    with automated data processing operations, including, but 10    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 11    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 12    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 13    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 14    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 15    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 16    security of the system or its data or the security of 17    materials exempt under this Section. 18        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 19    between public bodies and their employees or 20    representatives, except that any final contract or 21    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 22        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 23    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 24    an applicant for a license or employment. 25        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 26    to real estate purchase negotiations until those   SB2030- 11 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 2    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 3    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 4    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 5    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 6    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 7    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 8    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 9    until a sale is consummated. 10        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 11    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 12    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 13    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 14    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 15    intergovernmental risk management association or 16    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 17    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 18        (t) Information contained in or related to 19    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 20    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 21    for the regulation or supervision of financial 22    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 23    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 24    law. 25        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 26    the disclosure of secret or confidential information,   SB2030- 12 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 2    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 3    Electronic Transactions Act. 4        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 5    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 6    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 7    community's population or systems, facilities, or 8    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 9    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 10    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 11    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 12    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 13    include such things as details pertaining to the 14    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 15    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 16    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 17        (w) (Blank). 18        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 19    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 20    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 21    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 22    Illinois Power Agency. 23        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 24    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 25    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities   SB2030- 13 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 2    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission. 4        (z) Information about students exempted from 5    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 6    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 7    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 8    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 9    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 10        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 11    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 12        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 13    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 14    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 15    Mortality Review Team Act. 16        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 17    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 18    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 19    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.20        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 21    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 22    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 23    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 24        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 25    information of persons who are minors and are also 26    participants and registrants in programs of park   SB2030- 14 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 2    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 3    associations.4        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 5    information of participants and registrants in programs of 6    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 7    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 8    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 9    minors.10        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 11    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 12    2012. 13        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 14    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 15    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 16    School Code and any information contained in that report. 17        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 18    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 19    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 20    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 21    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 22    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 23    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 24    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 25    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 26    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of   SB2030- 15 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    Corrections.2        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 3    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 5    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 6    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 7    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 8    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 9    of a governmental entity or a person. 10        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 11    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 12    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 13    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 14    the procedure.15        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 17    Confidential Reporting Act. 18        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 19    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 20    Act. 21        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 22    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 23        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 24    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 25    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 26    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological   SB2030- 16 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 2    Act.3        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 4    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 5        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 6    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 7        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 8    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 9    protected health information, including demographic 10    information, that may be contained within or extracted 11    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 12    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 13    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 14    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 15    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 16    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 17    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 18    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 19    160.103. 20        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 21    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 22    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 23    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 24        (uu) Financial records and data related to real estate 25    income, expenses, and occupancy submitted by or on behalf 26    of a property owner to a chief county assessment officer,   SB2030- 17 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    except if submitted as part of an assessment appeal. 2    However, nothing in this paragraph (uu) prohibits a chief 3    county assessment officer from disclosing compiled and 4    anonymized data, and nothing in this paragraph (uu) shall 5    be construed to permit the chief county assessment officer 6    to withhold from public disclosure methodologies and 7    compiled and anonymized data used by any assessing 8    official in the valuation of property for assessment 9    purposes. 10    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 11Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 12prior to disclosure under this Act. 13    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 14public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 15agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 16behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 17governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 18Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 19for purposes of this Act. 20    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 21information or limit the availability of records to the 22public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 23in this Act. 24(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 25102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 261-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982,   SB2030- 18 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 2103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 38-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 4eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 5    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 6Division 6 to Article 9 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 9 Div. 6 heading new)8Division 6. Physical Descriptions of Income-Producing Property 9    (35 ILCS 200/9-280 new)10    Sec. 9-280. Definitions. As used in this Division:11    "Income" means revenue generated by the real property and 12directed to or received by the property owner in the form of 13rent from unrelated persons or entities and ancillary revenue 14payable to the owner from unrelated persons or entities and 15generated exclusively from the operation of the real property. 16"Income" includes revenue from parking or other amenities 17provided to or for the benefit of the property's tenants. 18"Income" does not include revenue generated from personal 19property, including, but not limited to, revenue from a 20business enterprise that is operated on the real property or 21improvements made to the property by a tenant. 22    "Income-producing property" means property that is not 23owner-occupied property, as defined in this Section, and that   SB2030- 19 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1is owned for the purpose of generating income from the 2property itself, regardless of whether the property actually 3generates income in a particular year. "Income-producing 4property" does not include:5        (1) property with a market value of $500,000 or less 6    in the most recent assessment year for which an assessment 7    is certified;8        (2) residential property containing fewer than 7 9    residential units;10        (3) property assessed under Article 10 of this Code 11    and stadiums that are not qualified property under Section 12    10-215 that have a seating capacity of 20,000 or more and 13    host major professional sporting events;14        (4) property assessed by the Department under Article 15    11 of this Code;16        (5) property that is owned or leased by a hospital 17    licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act or operated 18    under the University of Illinois Hospital Act, including 19    any hospital affiliate that directly or indirectly 20    controls, is controlled by, or is under common control 21    with a hospital; and22        (6) property that is owned or leased by a facility 23    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act that is an 24    intermediate or skilled facility. 25    "Owner-occupied property" means real property that is used 26or occupied by its owner or by a related person or entity as   SB2030- 20 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1described in subsection (b) of Section 267 of the Internal 2Revenue Code. 3    "Physical description" means the land size and information 4about the construction type, year built, total development 5size, number of buildings, number of stories in each building, 6and the capacity of structured parking garages, measured in 7the number of parking spaces. "Physical description" also 8includes the following: 9        (1) for residential property of 7 or more units:10            (A) whether any rented area is below grade;11            (B) the number of studio, 1-bedroom, 2-bedroom, 12        3-bedroom, and larger units;13            (C) whether or not the property offers tenants 14        access to a pool area;15            (D) whether or not the property offers tenants 16        access to an exercise area; and17            (E) whether any units in the building are enrolled 18        in any government-administered affordable housing 19        program. 20        (2) for office properties, a description of the net 21    rentable area of the property and a statement indicating 22    whether the owner represents to actual or prospective 23    tenants that the office space can accommodate x-ray or 24    magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) equipment or surgical 25    procedures; 26        (3) for retail properties, a description of the net   SB2030- 21 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    rentable area; 2        (4) for industrial properties:3            (A) the size and location of any office area or 4        areas on the property;5            (B) the number of loading bay doors;6            (C) whether the clear ceiling height on the first 7        floor is at least 18 feet but less than 24 feet, at 8        least 24 feet but less than 30 feet, or at least 30 9        feet;10            (D) whether the property provides refrigerated 11        storage; and12            (E) if the property is a data center, whether the 13        total electrical capacity in the property is: (i) less 14        than 250 megawatts; (ii) at least 250 megawatts but 15        less than 500 megawatts; (iii) at least 500 megawatts 16        but less than one gigawatt; (iv) at least one gigawatt 17        but less than 5 gigawatts; or (v) 5 or more gigawatts; 18        and 19        (5) for hospitality properties, a statement indicating 20    whether the property has more than 10,000 square feet of 21    conference area and the room count. 22    "Property" has the meaning set forth in Section 1-130 of 23this Code and includes contiguous parcels or property index 24numbers that comprise one functional property location.  25    (35 ILCS 200/9-290 new)  SB2030- 22 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    Sec. 9-290. Real property descriptions.2    (a) This Section applies to all counties in which the 3county board provides, by ordinance or resolution, that owners 4of income-producing properties must comply with this Section. 5Any ordinance or resolution providing that owners of 6income-producing properties must comply with this Section 7shall be adopted no later than December 31, 2029. 8    (b) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 9provisions of this Section apply as follows: 10        (1) if the general assessment year for the property is 11    2027, this Section applies from the effective date of the 12    ordinance or resolution adopted by the county board under 13    subsection (a) until December 31, 2029; 14        (2) if the general assessment year for the property is 15    2028, this Section applies from the effective date of the 16    ordinance or resolution adopted by the county board under 17    subsection (a) until December 31, 2030; and 18        (3) if the general assessment year for the property is 19    2029, this Section applies from the effective date of the 20    ordinance or resolution adopted by the county board under 21    subsection (a) until December 31, 2031. 22    In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 23provisions of this Section apply on and after the effective 24date of the ordinance or resolution adopted by the county 25board under subsection (a) and until December 31 of the fourth 26year following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution.   SB2030- 23 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1    (c) For the applicable period set forth in subsection (b), 2owners of income-producing properties in the county shall file 3physical descriptions of their properties with the chief 4county assessment officer in the form and manner determined by 5the chief county assessment officer. Such a filing by the 6owner is required only after the chief county assessment 7officer notifies the owner of the property of the request for 8information. That notice shall include an individualized 9statement specifying all physical description information that 10the assessor's office has on record or recorded against the 11property and shall contain a statement that the owner may 12confirm the information if no changes are required. A filing 13by the owner that no changes are required is compliance with 14the request for information. The notice shall include 15description records or a link to an Internet resource of 16description records for that property. 17    (d) A request for information under subsection (c) may be 18issued with respect to a property only once during one general 19reassessment cycle for the property. A response to the request 20for information shall be submitted to the chief county 21assessment officer within 90 days after the chief county 22assessment officer mails the notice to the property owner 23under subsection (c). 24    (e) If, upon receiving a request for information under 25this Section, the owner of a property fails to submit the 26required physical description within 90 days after the chief   SB2030- 24 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1county assessment officer mails the notice to the property 2owner and fails to adequately explain why no submission is 3required, the owner shall pay a penalty to the chief county 4assessment officer as determined by the chief county 5assessment officer of up to 0.025% of the prior year's market 6value for the property at issue, as indicated by the most 7recent certified assessed value, but in no case shall the 8owner be required to pay more than a maximum penalty of $1,000 9per property. All penalties under this Section shall be 10deposited into the county's general fund or as otherwise 11allocated by the county board. The penalty under this Section 12shall be waived if, upon notice of failure to file and the 13imposition of the penalty, the owner provides the requested 14physical descriptions within 30 days after the postmark date 15of the notice of failure to file and the imposition of the 16penalty. An owner who responds to a request for information 17received under this Section with good faith efforts based on 18reasonable information and belief, or who, upon diligent 19investigation, is unable to provide specific requested 20information and provides an answer to this effect, shall be 21determined to be in substantial compliance with this Section 22and shall not be subject to a penalty. Responses to requests 23for information under this Section consistent with documents 24from the sale or transfer of the property to the current owner 25or with published advertisements made by the owner to current 26or prospective tenants, unless the owner has modified those   SB2030- 25 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1particular aspects of the property since the sale, transfer, 2lease, or lease proffer, shall be deemed to be made in good 3faith. The owner may explain the reasons for any 4inconsistencies and be deemed to have responded in good faith, 5and any inconsistencies related to documents from the sale or 6transfer of the property prepared by a prior owner shall not be 7attributable to the current owner. The chief county assessment 8officer shall review all submissions and determine whether the 9owner provided sufficient evidence that the owner was not 10required to report a property description or that the 11submission complies based on available documentation. 12    (f) If a party is dissatisfied with a decision of the chief 13county assessment officer, the party may request review of 14that decision. Upon such a request, at least 30 days' notice 15shall be provided to the party of a hearing to be conducted by 16a hearing officer designated by the chief county assessment 17officer. If a party is dissatisfied with a hearing officer's 18decision, the party may appeal that decision to the circuit 19court of the county in which the property is located as a final 20administrative decision under the Administrative Review Law. 21If a party is unsuccessful at hearing, the penalty imposed 22under this Section shall bear interest at 0.05% per month 23thereafter, beginning 21 days after the date of the decision 24or 21 days after the date of the issuance of a final decision 25on administrative review, as applicable.  26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB2030- 26 -LRB104 09312 HLH 19370 b1becoming law.